North Dakota, session 69, HB1162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 61-39-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. The authority must be governed by a board of directors selected as follows:
a. One member from a city with a population greater than forty thousand located east of
state highway 1 and north of state highway 200.
b. One memberTwo members from a citydiffering cities with a population greater than forty
thousand located east of state highway 1 and south of state highway 200.
c. One member from a city with a population of five thousand but not more than forty
thousand located east of state highway 1.
d. One member from a city with a population of less than five thousand located east of state
highway 1.
e. Two members from water districts located east of state highway 1 and north of state
highway 200.
f. Two members from water districts located east of state highway 1 and south of state
highway 200.
g. One member from water districts located east of state highway 1.
h. One member from a Minnesota city with a population of more than thirty thousand and
which is located within five miles [8.05 kilometers] of this state.
i. One member from water districts located west of state highway 1.
j. One member from a city west of state highway 1.

H. B. NO. 1162 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1162.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 1 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State